Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2838.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Education and workforce innovation pilot program; eligibility; reporting requirements; delayed repeal A. The education and workforce innovation pilot program is established within the state board of education to develop and test innovative models of education that are aligned to student outcomes, attainment and workforce readiness.  The state board of education shall: 1. Administer the pilot program. 2. Establish an advisory committee that is composed of not more than seven total members who are appointed by the executive director of the state board of education.  The advisory committee must include members who represent the state board of charter schools and members who represent the state board of education. Advisory committee members are not eligible to receive compensation but are eligible for reimbursement of expenses pursuant to title 38, chapter 4, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes.  In the first meeting of the advisory committee, the advisory committee shall select one member to serve as chairperson.  The state board of education shall provide staff and meeting space for the advisory committee established pursuant to this paragraph.  The advisory committee members shall do all of the following: (a) Develop and recommend to the state board of education: (i) Policies, procedures and guidelines for the pilot program. (ii) An application for school districts and charter schools to apply to participate in the pilot program. (b) Review all applications to participate in the pilot program that are submitted by school districts and charter schools and recommend qualified applicants to the state board of education. (c) Monitor each public school that participates in the program to ensure that the public school protects student rights, safety and equity. (d) On or before December 1, 2026, prepare a report on the implementation of the program and submit the report to the state board of education. (e) On or before November 30, 2027 and November 30 of each year thereafter, prepare and submit to the state board of education an annual report that includes at least the following: (i) A description of the program implementation and progress. (ii) Program outcomes during the immediately preceding year and since the pilot program began. (f) On or before November 30, 2030, submit to the state board of education a final report that includes policy implications of the pilot program, findings and legislative recommendations. 3. Select not more than five public schools that are recommended by the advisory committee to participate in the pilot program for a term of three school years.  The public schools selected pursuant to this paragraph must include at least one of each of the following: (a) A public school that is rural as defined in section 15-249.13, Arizona Revised Statutes. (b) A public school that is located in an urban area. (c) A school district. (d) A charter school. 4. On or before December 30, 2026 and December 30 of each year thereafter, review the reports submitted by the advisory committee pursuant to paragraph 3, subdivisions (d), (e) and (f) of this subsection and approve each report, in whole or in part, and submit each approved report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate, and submit a copy of the report to the secretary of state. B. A school district or charter school may apply to participate in the pilot program by submitting at least the following information in the application that is developed pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 2 of this section: 1. A description of the proposed innovative model and the expected outcomes. 2. A request for an exemption, waiver or modification of specific state laws, rules or policies, together with an explanation of the reason for the request.  An applicant may not request an exemption, waiver or modification of federal law. 3. Specific goals and all methods that the applicant will use to evaluate progress and outcomes. 4. A timeline for implementing the innovative model. 5. A plan for each of the following: (a) Sustaining the innovative model after the termination of the pilot program. (b) Terminating the innovative model on termination of the pilot program, or as directed by the state board of education. 6. A list of the opportunities to earn college credits or credits that lead to a workforce certification or license, or both, that the applicant will provide to students. C. This section is repealed from and after July 1, 2031.